Louisiana, session 2026, HB759.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1483.2 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1483.2. Fortified roof endorsement; mandatory offer
A. Any authorized insurer writing homeowners' insurance policies shall offer
an endorsement to upgrade an insured's nonfortified home residential structure to
comply with the fortified roof standards of the Insurance Institute for Business and
Home Safety, if the insured incurs damage covered by the policy that requires the
roof to be replaced. The endorsement shall upgrade the home consistent with the
fortified requirements for the geographic area in which the home is located.
B. The endorsement offer provided for in Subsection A of this Section shall
be made at the time of writing a new homeowners' policy on a nonfortified home and
upon first renewal of an existing homeowners' policy on a nonfortified home after
December 31, 2023.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1197 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 759
C. Insurers required to make an endorsement offer pursuant to this Section
shall file endorsement forms and accompanying rates with the department by
October 1, 2023. The requirements of this Section shall apply only to homeowners'
policies covering residential structures with a roof that was installed within ten years
of the date of offering the policy or renewal that are eligible to be retrofitted to
comply with the fortified roof standards of the Insurance Institute for Business and
Home Safety. If an insurer sells an endorsement provided for in this Section and
thereafter discovers that the insured structure is not eligible to be retrofitted to the
fortified roof standards of the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety, the
insurer shall refund to the insured any premiums collected under the endorsement,
less the costs of determining the structure was not eligible.
D. This Section shall not be construed to prohibit an insurer from voluntarily
offering the endorsement provided for in this Section for a homeowners' policy
covering a residential structure with a roof installed more than ten years after the
date of the policy being offered or renewed, and this Section shall not be construed
to prohibit an insurer from using the age or condition of the roof as a rating factor in
determining the premium to be charged for the endorsement.